Washington statutes.
RCW 15.115.200

Bond requirements.

Unless covered by a blanket bond covering officials or employees of the state of Washington, every administrator, employee, or other person occupying a position of trust for the commission and every commission member actually handling or drawing upon funds shall give a bond in the penal amount as may be required by the commission, the premium for which bond or bonds must be paid by the commission.

[ 2009 c 33 s 21.]